District of Columbia statutes.
16-4432

Savings clause.

This chapter does not affect an action or proceeding commenced or right accrued before the effective date of this chapter. Subject to § 16-4403, an arbitration agreement made before the effective date of this chapter is governed by §§ 16-4301 to 16-4319.

History

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-111, § 2(b), 55 DCR 1847

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 33 of the Uniform Arbitration Act (2000).